Washington statutes.
RCW 3.58.050

Other court expenses—Lease, construction, of courtrooms and offices.

The county legislative authority shall furnish all necessary facilities for the district courts, including suitable courtrooms, furniture, books, stationery, postage, office equipment, heat, light and telephone and may lease or construct courtrooms and offices for such purpose. The county legislative authority shall not be required to furnish courtroom space in any place other than as provided in the districting plan.

[ 1984 c 258 s 38; 1963 c 213 s 3; 1961 c 299 s 104.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.